Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 27. Incentive for Energy Independence Act
154.27-070.
Sales and use tax incentives.

Notwithstanding KRS 134.580(3) and 139.770, on or after January 1, 2008, an approved company is eligible for an incentive in an amount up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky sales and use tax paid, reduced by the vendor compensation provided under KRS 139.570, on the purchase of tangible personal property, including but not limited to materials, machinery, and equipment used to construct, retrofit, or upgrade an eligible project.

The incentive shall not include tangible personal property purchased before the activation date or purchases of operating supplies, or repair, replacement, or spare parts as defined in KRS 139.010.

Upon the activation date, an approved company may be eligible for the incentive offered under this section. The approved company shall file a request for the incentive payment with the department as provided in KRS 139.517.

The incentive provided in this section shall expire upon the completion of the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the eligible project, or five (5) years from the activation date, whichever is earlier.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 7, effective August 30, 2007; 2008, ch. 95, § 19, effective August 1, 2008; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018.

154.27-080.
Income and limited liability entity tax incentives — Assessment on employees’ wages.

An approved company may be eligible for income tax-related incentives as follows:

A credit of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS 141.040 or 141.020, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be owed by the approved company to the Commonwealth for the approved company’s tax year, on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the eligible project, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205.

The credit allowed the approved company shall be applied against both the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with credit ordering as provided in KRS 141.0205, for the tax year for which the tax return of the approved company is filed.

The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under KRS 141.044 on the Kentucky taxable income, Kentucky gross receipts, or Kentucky gross profits generated by or arising from the eligible project.

The credit provided by this subsection shall be determined as provided in KRS 141.421.

The approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of the approved company may require that each employee subject to the state income tax imposed by KRS 141.020, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment of up to four percent (4%) of his or her gross wages. The assessment shall be uniform against all employees against whom it is assessed and shall be imposed at a percentage rate that is negotiated as part of the tax incentive agreement.

The assessment may be imposed against each employee:
(a) 1.

The assessment may be imposed against each employee:

Whose job was created as a result of the eligible project;

Who is employed by the approved company to work at the facility; and

Who is on the payroll of the approved company or, with the authority’s consent, is on the payroll of an affiliate of the approved company.

Construction workers, employees of the approved company directly employed in the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the eligible facility, contract workers, and leased workers shall not be considered employees of the approved company for purposes of the assessment permitted by this subsection.

Each employee so assessed shall be entitled to credits against Kentucky income tax equal to the assessment withheld from wages during the calendar year as provided by KRS 141.310 and 141.421.

An approved company that elects to impose the assessment as a condition of employment is authorized to deduct the assessment from each paycheck of each employee.

The approved company shall provide to the authority the information necessary to monitor the tax incentive agreement and the authorization for the authority to share the information with the department as necessary for purposes of enforcing the terms of the tax incentive agreement.

Any assessment imposed pursuant to this subsection shall permanently expire upon termination or expiration of the tax incentive agreement.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8, effective August 30, 2007; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 69, effective June 27, 2019.

154.27-090.
Advance disbursement of incentives — Computation of maximum disbursement amount — Schedule for disbursement — Repayment.

An approved company may be eligible for the advance disbursement of a portion of the post-construction period incentives for which it has been approved. The amount of the advance disbursement shall be based on the employment of Kentucky residents during the construction of the facility, shall be negotiated with the authority as part of the tax incentive agreement, and shall not exceed the limitations established by this section.

The authority shall compute the maximum amount of the advance disbursement employment incentive as follows:

The base amount shall equal the total capital investment specified in the tax incentive agreement multiplied by the labor intensity factor as determined in paragraph (c) of this subsection;

The base amount shall then be multiplied by the Kentucky resident factor as determined in paragraph (d) of this subsection. The resulting amount shall be the maximum advance disbursement employment incentive that the authority may approve;

The labor intensity factor shall be:

Twenty-five percent (25%), if the estimated labor component for the eligible project is greater than thirty percent (30%) of the total capital investment;

Twenty percent (20%), if the estimated labor component for the eligible project is greater than twenty-five percent (25%) but less than or equal to thirty percent (30%) of the total capital investment; or

Fifteen percent (15%), if the estimated labor component for the eligible project is equal to or less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total capital investment; and

The Kentucky resident factor shall be four percent (4%) multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the estimated total gross wages that will be paid to Kentucky residents who are working on the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the eligible project, and the denominator of which shall be the estimated total gross wages that will be paid to all workers working on the construction, retrofit, or upgrade of the eligible project.

The tax incentive agreement shall include a schedule for the disbursement of the advance disbursement employment incentive during the construction period. In negotiating the disbursement schedule, the authority shall consider the possible increased risk to the Commonwealth associated with the disbursement of funds prior to construction completion.

The approved company shall repay the advance disbursement through a reduction in the post-construction period incentive amounts it would otherwise receive. The amount by which the post-construction period incentive amounts are reduced shall be applied as a credit against the amount owed by the approved company.
(4) (a)

The approved company shall repay the advance disbursement through a reduction in the post-construction period incentive amounts it would otherwise receive. The amount by which the post-construction period incentive amounts are reduced shall be applied as a credit against the amount owed by the approved company.

The amount of the annual reduction, the incentives the reduction shall apply to, interest due, the time period over which the advance disbursement amount shall be recouped, and alternate payment methods if incentives are not sufficient to repay the advance disbursement shall be negotiated between the authority and the approved company as part of the tax incentive agreement.

The repayment schedule included in the tax incentive agreement shall require uniform incremental payments, to the extent possible, and shall continue until the entire advance disbursement amount has been repaid by the approved company.

The tax incentive agreement shall include a provision addressing an alternate method for payment if incentives are not sufficient to repay the advance disbursement.

The total post-construction incentive payments for which an approved company is eligible shall be tracked by the department. That portion of the incentive amounts identified in the tax incentive agreement as being devoted to the repayment of the advance disbursement amount shall be credited against the balance due from the approved company and shall not be paid to or retained by the approved company.

The department shall forward the amounts credited to the repayment of the advance disbursement amount to the Cabinet for Economic Development, Department of Financial Incentives for deposit in the Energy Projects Economic Development Bond Pool.

During the period for which any portion of the post-construction incentive payments are being credited toward the advance disbursement amount, the approved company shall, at the direction of the authority or the department, file all required requests for incentives, submit all required remittances, make all required tax payments, and provide to the department and the authority any information that would normally be required for the approved company to receive the incentives.

The authority may, for purposes of administering the provisions of this section, solicit information or consultation from one (1) or more of the following sources:

The Office of Energy Policy;

The Center for Applied Energy Research;

The Department for Workforce Investment; or

Any public postsecondary education institution within the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9, effective August 30, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 203, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 58, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018.

154.27-095.
Applications for incentives not accepted after August 1, 2018.

No application for incentives found in KRS 154.27-010 to 154.27-100 shall be accepted by the authority for alternative fuel facilities, gasification facility, energy-efficient facility, renewable energy facility, or a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline after August 1, 2018. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 199, § 27, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 141, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

154.27-100.
Construction of carbon dioxide transmission pipeline — Proceedings for condemnation under Eminent Domain Act — Legislative determination of essential public use.

For the purposes of this section, “carbon dioxide transmission pipeline” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.27-010.

If a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline company has received a construction certificate from the Kentucky State Board on Electric Generation and Siting under KRS 278.714 and is unable to contract or agree with the owner after a good-faith effort to do so, the company may condemn the lands and material for the use and occupation of the lands that are necessary for:

Constructing, maintaining, utilizing, operating, and gaining access to a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline and all necessary machinery, equipment, pumping stations, appliances, and fixtures for use in connection with a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline; and

Obtaining all necessary rights of ingress and egress to construct, examine, alter, repair, maintain, operate, or remove a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline and all of its component parts.

The proceedings for condemnation shall be as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

Carbon dioxide transmission pipelines, and the routing, construction, maintenance, and operation of them are, as a matter of legislative determination, declared to be a public use essential to the fulfillment of the purposes of this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 82, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 207, § 149, effective July 14, 2018.